Tennessee, session 114, HB1643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-12-126(a), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(a) Except for suspensions under § 55-12-115, and the proof required as
provided in § 55-12-114, a person who is required to provide proof of financial
responsibility shall maintain that proof for a minimum of one (1) year, or for the period of
the revocation or suspension, whichever is longer. If a person elects to use a policy of
insurance and financial responsibility insurance certificate as proof of financial
responsibility under this section, then the effective date on the financial responsibility
certificate is the date upon which financial responsibility was proven, and financial
responsibility must be maintained for the period of the suspension or revocation.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-12-126(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) If during the period requiring proof of financial responsibility under subsection
(a), the person filed proof of another policy or bond meeting the requirements of this
part, then the person's license and registration shall not be suspended or revoked as
required in subdivision (b)(1).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-12-126(d), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(d) The department of safety shall release a person's requirement to provide
proof of financial responsibility after the expiration of the period required by subsection
HB1643
010046
- 1 -

(a), if the department of safety's records establish that during the period, the person was
not convicted of an additional offense authorizing or requiring the suspension or
revocation of the person's license, nor was the person's license suspended, revoked,
prohibited, or cancelled due to a separate violation of law. If the department of safety,
pursuant to this subsection (d), releases the requirement that a person furnish proof of
financial responsibility, and if the person's motor vehicle registration has been
suspended or revoked because of the person's failure to furnish that proof, then the
commissioner of safety shall request that the commissioner of revenue reinstate the
person's registration and, upon payment to the commissioner of revenue of the
appropriate motor vehicle registration fees provided by § 55-4-111, § 55-4-112, or § 55-
4-113, the registration must be reinstated immediately. Notwithstanding another law to
the contrary, this subsection (d) does not apply if there is an unsatisfied judgment based
on a motor vehicle accident.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
- 2 - 010046